North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 31B. Declaration of Vacancy, Suspension of Salary.

§ 7A-410.
Vacancy exists on disbarment.

When a judge of the district court, judge of the superior court, judge of the Court of Appeals, justice of the Supreme Court, or a district attorney is no longer authorized to practice law in the courts of this State, the Governor shall declare the office vacant. Prior to making such declaration, the Governor shall notify the justice, judge, or district attorney at least 10 days in advance of taking such action and shall afford the justice, judge, or district attorney the opportunity to be heard on the matter. For purposes of this Article, the term “no longer authorized to practice law” means that the person has been disbarred or suspended and all appeals under

G.S. 84-28

have been exhausted.

History.

2007-104, s. 1.

§ 7A-410.1.
Suspension of salary.

When a justice, judge, or district attorney has been disbarred or suspended from the practice of law under

G.S. 84-28

but the office has not been declared vacant under

G.S. 7A-410

, the salary of the justice, judge, or district attorney is suspended immediately. If the order of disbarment or suspension is reversed on appeal, the salary shall be paid retroactively from the date the salary was suspended.

History.

2007-104, s. 1.